Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.050

Contracts for—Other law applicable to.

The state superintendent of public instruction is hereby authorized to enter into any contract with the United States of America, or any agency thereof, for the purchase of any surplus or donated food commodities, without regard to the provisions of any other law requiring the advertising, giving notice, inviting or receiving bids, or which may require the delivery of purchases before payment.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.30.020. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 92 s 7. Formerly RCW 28A.30.020, 28.30.020.]